Hawaii, session 2026, GM1105.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
1 SECTION 1. Section 578-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
2 amended by amending subsections (a) and (b) to read as follows:
3 "(a) Persons required to consent to adoption. Unless
4 consent is not required or is dispensed with under subsection
5 (c), a petition to adopt a child may be granted only if written
6 consent to the proposed adoption has been notarized by a notary
7 public in this or any other jurisdiction and executed by:
8 (1) The birthing parent of the child;
9 (2) A legal non-birthing parent to whom the child is a
10 legitimate child;
11 (3) An adjudicated non-birthing parent whose relationship
12 to the child has been determined by a court;
13 (4) A presumed non-birthing parent under subsection (d) ;
14 (5) A concerned natural non-birthing parent who is not the
15 legal, adjudicated, or presumed non-birthing parent
16 but who has demonstrated a reasonable degree of
HB LRB 26-0276.docx

Page 2
H.B. NO. 2633’
1 interest, concern, or responsibility as to the welfare
2 of a child, either:
3 (A) During the first thirty days after the child's
4 birth;
5 (B) Before the execution of a valid consent by the
6 birthing parent of the child; or
7 (C) Before the placement of the child with adoptive
8 parents;
9 whichever period of time is greater;
10 (6) Any person or agency having legal custody of the child
11 or legally empowered to consent;
12 (7) The court having jurisdiction of the custody of the
13 child, if the legal guardian or legal custodian of the
14 person of the child is not empowered to consent to
15 adoption; and
16 (8) The child to be adopted if the child is more than ten
17 years of age, unless the court, in the best interest
18 of the child, dispenses with the child's consent.
19 (b) A petition to adopt an adult may be granted only if
20 written consent to adoption has been notarized by a notary
HB LRB 26-0276.docx 2
■oHiwHnniaii

Page 3
H.B. NO. 2OB3-
1 public in this or any other jurisdiction and executed by the
2 adult and the adult's spouse, if the adult is married."
SECTION 2. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
5
INTRODUCED BY:
By Request
JAN 2 3 2026
HB LRB 26-0276.docx
■■iiiiiuliiiin

2088
H.B. NO.
APPROVED this 28th day of April ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 2088
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: March 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Third Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: APR 1 4 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Third Reading in the
Senate of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session of 2026.
President of the Senate
Carol T. Taniguchi
Clerk of the Senate